Utah statutes.
31A-7-305.   Supervision of management changes.
Subsections 31A-5-410 (1) (a) and 31A-5-410 (3) apply to supervision and
management changes in corporations organized and operating under this chapter.
If a trustee is removed from the board of trustees in the manner specified
under Subsection 31A-7-303 (6), the action shall be reported to the
commissioner within ten days of the removal.
